Colorado statutes. TITLE 40 Utilities
PART 2
ENERGY STORAGE SYSTEMS

Cross references:

For the short title ("Energy Storage Procurement Act") in HB 18-1270, see section 1 of chapter 360, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

40-2-201. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds, determines, and declares that:

Energy storage systems provide potential opportunities to:

Reduce system costs;

Support diversification of energy resources; and

Enhance grid safety and reliability;

For these reasons, it is in the public interest to explore the use of energy storage systems in Colorado and to integrate into the planning process mechanisms for the procurement of energy storage systems by Colorado's electric utilities through evaluation and procurement methodologies.

Source: L. 2018:

Entire part added, (HB 18-1270), ch. 360, p. 2151, § 2, effective August 8.

40-2-202. Definitions.

As used in this part 2, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Electric utility" means an investor-owned electric utility subject to regulation under articles 1 to 7 of this title 40.

"Energy storage system" means commercially available technology that is capable of retaining energy, storing the energy for a period of time, and delivering the energy after storage by chemical, thermal, mechanical, or other means.

"Procure" or "procurement" means to acquire by ownership or by a contractual right to use the energy from, or the capacity of, an energy storage system.

Source: L. 2018:

Entire part added, (HB 18-1270), ch. 360, p. 2152, § 2, effective August 8.

40-2-203. Procurement mechanisms - determination by commission - rules.

On or before February 1, 2019, the commission shall establish, by rule, as part of the planning process, mechanisms for the procurement of energy storage systems by an electric utility; except that these mechanisms must not affect any ongoing resource acquisitions or competitive bidding processes that existed on February 1, 2018.

In adopting the rules required by subsection (1) of this section, the commission shall use its best efforts to create conditions under which the procurement of energy storage systems by an electric utility will provide systemic benefits, including:

Increased integration of energy into the grid of the electric utility;

Improved reliability of the grid;

A reduction in the need for the increased generation of electricity during periods of peak demand; and

The avoidance, reduction, or deferral of investment by the electric utility.

Pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, and in consideration of all known and measurable benefits and costs to an electric utility, the commission shall adopt rules:

Establishing mechanisms for the inclusion of benefits and costs associated with energy storage systems into the planning conducted by electric utilities;

Requiring electric utilities to provide to the commission, and allowing electric utilities to provide to third parties as approved by the commission, appropriate data and analysis of potential storage acquisitions in their planning processes, including potential interconnection points. The commission shall treat information provided to the commission or to approved third parties under this subsection (3)(b) as confidential and ensure that the commission and any approved third party manages the information in accordance with all commission rules and federal and state laws concerning customer data and personally identifiable information. If the commission finds that a third party has failed to comply with any applicable rules, laws, or conditions of approval under this subsection (3)(b), the commission may deem that party ineligible to bid or develop storage systems in the subsequent electric resource plan.

Ensuring that any storage system project added to the electric grid will not compromise the security, safety, or reliability of the electric grid or any part of the electric grid;

Establishing that an energy storage system may be owned by an electric utility or by any other person;

Establishing requirements for the filing by an electric utility of acquisition plans containing an analysis of the integration and use of electric storage systems.

The requirements under this subsection (3)(e) must include the requirement that an electric utility provide in its acquisition plans:

Modeling assumptions used to assess the costs and benefits of energy storage systems; and

Model contracts for procurement of energy storage systems.

Requiring the electric utility to include such other information as the commission may require in its documentation relating to planning.

On or before May 1, 2019, electric utilities may file applications for rate-based projects, not to exceed fifteen megawatts of capacity, for energy storage systems. Nothing in this section is intended to prohibit or deter cost-effective storage deployment.

Source: L. 2018:

Entire part added, (HB 18-1270), ch. 360, p. 2152, § 2, effective August 8.